Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
ARTICLE 112
SALE OF PROPERTY

Cross references:

For definitions applicable to this article, see §§ 7-90-102 and 7-101-401.

Law reviews:

For article, "Commercial and Corporate Law", which discusses a Tenth Circuit decision dealing with parent company liability for breaching subsidiary-employee contract, see 65 Den. U.L. Rev. 492 (1988).

Section

7-112-101. Sale or mortgage of property without shareholder approval.

A corporation may, as authorized by its bylaws or by the board of directors:

Sell, lease, exchange, or otherwise dispose of any or all of its property in the usual and regular course of business;

Mortgage, pledge, dedicate to the repayment of indebtedness, whether with or without recourse, or otherwise encumber any or all of its property whether or not in the usual and regular course of business; or

Transfer any or all of its property to a domestic corporation all the shares of which are owned, directly or indirectly, by the corporation.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, approval by the shareholders of a transaction described in subsection (1) of this section is not required.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 811, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 96:

IP(1) amended, p. 1321, § 29, effective June 1.

7-112-102. Sale of property requiring shareholder approval.

A corporation may sell, lease, exchange, or otherwise dispose of all, or substantially all, of its property, with or without its good will, other than in the usual and regular course of business on the terms and conditions and for the consideration determined by the board of directors, if the board of directors proposes and the shareholders approve the transaction. A sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of all, or substantially all, of the property of a corporation, with or without its good will, in connection with its dissolution, other than in the usual and regular course of business, and other than pursuant to a court order, shall be subject to the requirements of this section; but a sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of all, or substantially all, of the property of a corporation, with or without its good will, pursuant to a court order shall not be subject to the requirements of this section.

If a corporation is entitled to vote or otherwise consent, other than in the usual and regular course of its business, with respect to the sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of all, or substantially all, of the property with or without the good will of another entity which it controls, and if the shares or other interests held by the corporation in such other entity constitute all, or substantially all, of the property of the corporation, then the corporation shall consent to such transaction only if the board of directors proposes and the shareholders approve the giving of consent.

For a transaction described in subsection (1) of this section or a consent described in subsection (2) of this section to be approved by the shareholders:

The board of directors shall recommend the transaction or the consent to the shareholders unless the board of directors determines that, because of conflict of interest or other special circumstances, it should make no recommendation and communicates the basis for its determination to the shareholders with the submission of the transaction; and

The shareholders entitled to vote on the transaction or the consent shall approve the transaction or the consent as provided in subsection (6) of this section.

The board of directors may condition the effectiveness of the transaction or the consent on any basis.

The corporation shall give notice, in accordance with section 7-107-105, to each shareholder entitled to vote on the transaction described in subsection (1) of this section or the consent described in subsection (2) of this section, of the shareholders' meeting at which the transaction or the consent will be voted upon. The notice shall:

State that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider:

In the case of action pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of all, or substantially all, of the property of the corporation; or

In the case of action pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the corporation's consent to the sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of all, or substantially all, of the property of another entity (which entity shall be identified in the notice), shares or other interests of which are held by the corporation and constitute all, or substantially all, of the property of the corporation; and

Contain or be accompanied by a description of the transaction, in the case of action pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, or by a description of the transaction underlying the consent, in the case of action pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.

Unless articles 101 to 117 of this title (including the provisions of section 7-117-101 (9)), the articles of incorporation, bylaws adopted by the shareholders, or the board of directors acting pursuant to subsection (4) of this section require a greater vote, the transaction described in subsection (1) of this section or the consent described in subsection (2) of this section shall be approved by each voting group entitled to vote separately on the transaction or consent by a majority of all the votes entitled to be cast on the transaction or the consent by that voting group.

After a transaction described in subsection (1) of this section or a consent described in subsection (2) of this section is authorized, the transaction may be abandoned or the consent withheld or revoked, subject to any contractual rights or other limitations on such abandonment, withholding, or revocation, without further shareholder action.

A transaction that constitutes a distribution is governed by section 7-106-401 and not by this section.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 811, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.